District of Columbia statutes.
25-341

Repealed

Targeted Ward 4 Moratorium Zone.

Repealed.

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(o), 51 DCR 6525
Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-211, § 2(c), 55 DCR 6984
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 81(b), 59 DCR 6190
D.C. Law 17-211 repealed subsec. (d) which had read as follows: “(d) This section shall expire 4 years after September 30, 2004. No later than 60 days before the expiration of this section, the Council Committee having jurisdiction over the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall hold a public hearing on the present need and appropriateness of the Targeted Ward 4 Moratorium Zone.”
For temporary (90 day) additions, see § 2(b) to (d) of Mt. Pleasant, Targeted Ward 2, and Ward 6 Single Sales Moratorium Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-471, July 28, 2008, 55 DCR 9004).
The effective date of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Amendment Act of 2004, passed on 2nd reading on May 18, 2004 (Enrolled version of Bill 15-516), referred to subsec. (d), is September 30, 2004.